Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5479SV (1) 91 jm/ns S.F. 2138 Section 1. Section 123.5, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. Members of the commission shall be chosen on the basis 3 of managerial ability and experience as business executives. 4 Not more than two members of the commission may be the holder 5 of or have an interest in a permit or license to manufacture 6 alcoholic liquor, wine, or beer or to sell alcoholic liquor, 7 wine, or beer at wholesale or retail directly or indirectly; 8 individually; as a member of a partnership or an association; 9 as a member, owner, or stockholder, except as an institutional 10 investor, of a corporation or other entity; or as a relative to 11 an individual by blood or marriage within the second degree, 12 do any of the following: 13 a. Hold a permit or license to manufacture alcoholic 14 beverages or sell alcoholic beverages at wholesale or retail . 15 b. Have an interest in the manufacture of or dealing in 16 alcoholic beverages or in an enterprise or industry in which 17 alcoholic beverages are required. 18 c. Receive a commission or profit on the purchase or sale of 19 alcoholic beverages by any person. 20 d. Have an interest in or mortgage or deed of trust on any 21 land or building where alcoholic beverages are manufactured for 22 sale, offered for sale, or sold, or in any personal property 23 used in the manufacture or sale of alcoholic beverages. 24 Sec. 2. Section 123.5, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 25 following new subsections: 26 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. In addition to the requirements of 27 chapter 68B, members of the commission shall not directly or 28 indirectly use the office of the member to influence, persuade, 29 or induce any person to adopt their political views or to favor 30 any particular candidate for an elective or appointive public 31 office. 32 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. This section does not prohibit a 33 commission member from lawfully purchasing and keeping 34 alcoholic beverages in the possession of the commission member. 35 -1- LSB 5479SV (1) 91 jm/ns 1/ 4 S.F. 2138 Sec. 3. Section 123.13, Code 2026, is amended by striking 1 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 2 123.13 Prohibitions ââ director and employees. 3 1. For purposes of this section, âdirectorâ means the 4 director of revenue but does not include the directorâs 5 designee. 6 2. The requirements of this section are in addition to the 7 requirements of chapter 68B. 8 3. The director shall not directly or indirectly; 9 individually; as a member of a partnership or an association; 10 as a member, owner, or stockholder, except as an institutional 11 investor, of a corporation or other entity; or as a relative to 12 an individual by blood or marriage within the second degree, 13 do any of the following: 14 a. Have an interest in the manufacture of or dealing in 15 alcoholic beverages or in an enterprise or industry in which 16 alcoholic beverages are required. 17 b. Receive a commission or profit from the purchase or sale 18 of alcoholic beverages by any person. 19 c. Have an interest in or mortgage or deed of trust on any 20 land or building where alcoholic beverages are manufactured for 21 sale, offered for sale, or sold, or in any personal property 22 used in the manufacture or sale of alcoholic beverages. 23 4. An employee of the department shall not license, 24 permit, or participate in the licensing or permitting of a 25 person, business, or organization that requires a license or 26 permit under the laws and rules governing alcoholic beverages, 27 if the employee has an ownership interest related to that 28 person, business, or organization, or is in a position to 29 exercise any control over the purchasing of alcoholic beverages 30 through a position of employment with the person, business, or 31 organization. 32 5. An employee of the department shall not enforce any 33 law or rule governing alcoholic beverages against a person, 34 business, or organization that requires a license or permit 35 -2- LSB 5479SV (1) 91 jm/ns 2/ 4 S.F. 2138 under the laws and rules governing alcoholic beverages, 1 if the employee has an ownership interest related to that 2 person, business, or organization, or is in a position to 3 exercise any control over the purchase of alcoholic beverages 4 through a position of employment with the person, business, or 5 organization. 6 6. The director or an employee of the department violating 7 this section or any other provision of this chapter shall, in 8 addition to any other penalties provided by law, be subject 9 to disciplinary action up to and including discharge from 10 employment. 11 7. This section does not prohibit the director or an 12 employee of the department from lawfully purchasing and keeping 13 alcoholic beverages in the possession of the director or the 14 employee. 15 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 16 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 17